apertium-azz.azz.lexc
LEXICON ADV-SPA

%<adv%>:                                           # ; 

LEXICON ADV-ITG

%<adv%>%<itg%>:                                    # ; 

LEXICON ADV-REL

%<adv%>%<rel%>:                                    # ; 

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON ADJ

%<adj%>%<sg%>:                                           V-AGR-PRET ; 
%<adj%>%<pl%>:%>mej                                V-AGR-PRET ; 
%<adj%>%<hon%>:%>tsin                              V-AGR-PRET ; 
%<adj%>%<hon%>%<pl%>:%>tsi%>tsin                   V-AGR-PRET ; 

LEXICON ADJ-REDUP

%<adj%>%<redup%>:                                  V-AGR-PRET ; 
%<adj%>%<redup%>%<pl%>:%>mej                       V-AGR-PRET ; 
%<adj%>%<redup%>%<hon%>:%>tsin                     V-AGR-PRET ; 
%<adj%>%<redup%>%<hon%>%<pl%>:%>tsi%>tsin          V-AGR-PRET ; 

LEXICON ADJ-HUEI
%<adj%>%<sg%>:%>i                                        V-AGR-PRET ; 
%<adj%>%<hon%>%<sg%>:i%>tsin                             V-AGR-PRET ; 
%<adj%>%<hon%>%<pl%>:i%>tsi%>tsin                  V-AGR-PRET ; 

LEXICON ADJ-KUALI
%<adj%>%<sg%>:%>i                                        V-AGR-PRET ; 
%<adj%>%<hon%>%<sg%>:%>tsin                              V-AGR-PRET ; 
%<adj%>%<hon%>%<pl%>:%>tsi%>tsin                   V-AGR-PRET ; 

LEXICON ADJ-TSIN

%<adj%>%<sg%>:                                           V-AGR-PRET ; 

LEXICON ADJ-SPA-MEJOR

%<adj%>%<mf%>%<sg%>:                               # ; 
%<adj%>%<mf%>%<pl%>:%>es                           # ; 
%<adj%>%<dim%>%<m%>:%>cit%>o                       PL-ES ; 
%<adj%>%<dim%>%<f%>:%>cit%>a                       PL-ES ; 

LEXICON ADJ-SPA-LIBRE

%<adj%>%<mf%>:                                     PL-ES ; 
%<adj%>%<dim%>%<m%>:%>cit%>o                       PL-ES ; 
%<adj%>%<dim%>%<f%>:%>cit%>a                       PL-ES ; 

LEXICON ADJ-SPA-MALO
%<adj%>%<m%>:%>o                                   PL-ES ; 
%<adj%>%<f%>:%>a                                   PL-ES ; 
%<adj%>%<dim%>%<m%>:%>it%>o                        PL-ES ; 
%<adj%>%<dim%>%<f%>:%>it%>a                        PL-ES ; 

LEXICON PL-ES 

%<sg%>:                                            # ;
%<pl%>:%>s                                         # ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON NUM

%<num%>:                                           # ; 

LEXICON NUM-REDUP

%<num%>%<redup%>:                                  # ; 

LEXICON NUM-SE

%<num%>:                                           # ; 
%<num%>%<hon%>:%>tsin                              # ; 

LEXICON NUM-SPA

%<num%>:                                           # ; 

LEXICON CC

%<cnjcoo%>:                                        # ;

LEXICON CS

%<cnjsub%>:                                        # ;

LEXICON INTERJ

%<ij%>:                                            # ;

LEXICON FALSE 

:%.%.%.                                            # ; 
                                                   # ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON BASES

@R.SUBJ.1@@R.OBJ.1@@R.IOBJ.1@:@R.SUBJ.1@@R.OBJ.1@@R.IOBJ.1@ SIO ;
@R.SUBJ.1@@R.OBJ.1@@D.IOBJ@:@R.SUBJ.1@@R.OBJ.1@@D.IOBJ@     SO ;
@R.SUBJ.1@@D.OBJ@@R.IOBJ.1@:@R.SUBJ.1@@D.OBJ@@R.IOBJ.1@     SI ;
@R.SUBJ.1@@D.OBJ@@D.IOBJ@:@R.SUBJ.1@@D.OBJ@@D.IOBJ@         S ;
@D.SUBJ@@D.OBJ@@D.IOBJ@:@D.SUBJ@@D.OBJ@@D.IOBJ@             Ø ;

LEXICON Ø

! "llover"
kiyohui:kiyohui                                    V-Ø-PRES   ; 
kiyohui:kiyohui                                    V-Ø-IMPF   ;
kiyohui:kiyohui                                    V-Ø-PROG   ;
kiyohui:kiyohui                                    V-Ø-PRET   ; 
kiyohui:kiyohui                                    V-Ø-FUTR   ; 

! ""
tona:tona                                          V-Ø-PRES   ; 
tona:tona                                          V-Ø-IMPF   ;
tona:tona                                          V-Ø-PROG   ;
tona:tona                                          V-Ø-PRET   ; 
tona:tona                                          V-Ø-FUTR   ; 

! ""
ejeka:ejeka                                        V-Ø-PRES   ; 
ejeka:ejeka                                        V-Ø-IMPF   ;
ejeka:ejeka                                        V-Ø-PROG   ;
ejeka:ejeka                                        V-Ø-PRET   ; 
ejeka:ejeka                                        V-Ø-FUTR   ; 

! ""
metstona:metstona                                  V-Ø-PRES   ; 
metstona:metstona                                  V-Ø-IMPF   ;
metstona:metstona                                  V-Ø-PROG   ;
metstona:metstona                                  V-Ø-PRET   ; 
metstona:metstona                                  V-Ø-FUTR   ; 

! "anochecer"
tayohua:tayohua                                    V-Ø-PRES   ; 
tayohua:tayohua                                    V-Ø-IMPF   ;
tayohua:tayohua                                    V-Ø-PROG   ;
tayohua:tayohua                                    V-Ø-PRET   ; 
tayohua:tayohua                                    V-Ø-FUTR   ; 


! ""
tayemani:tayemani                                  V-Ø-PRES   ; 
tayemani:tayemani                                  V-Ø-IMPF   ;
tayemani:tayemani                                  V-Ø-PROG   ;
tayemani:tayemani                                  V-Ø-PRET   ; 
tayemani:tayemani                                  V-Ø-FUTR   ; 


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON Irregulares 

Yohui ; 
Huitsa ; 
Huala ; 
Onkak ;

LEXICON Onkak

%<s_sg3%>onkak%<v%>%<iv%>%<pres%>:onkak            # ;
%<s_pl3%>onkak%<v%>%<iv%>%<pres%>:onkak%>ej        # ;

%<s_sg3%>onkak%<v%>%<iv%>%<cfact%>:onka%>ni        # ;
%<s_pl3%>onkak%<v%>%<iv%>%<cfact%>:onka%>ni%>j     # ;

%<s_sg3%>onkak%<v%>%<iv%>%<fut%>:onka%>s        # ;
%<s_pl3%>onkak%<v%>%<iv%>%<fut%>:onka%>s%>kej     # ;


LEXICON Yohui 

%<s_sg1%>yohui%<v%>%<iv%>%<pres%>:ni%>yo           # ;
%<s_sg2%>yohui%<v%>%<iv%>%<pres%>:ti%>yo           # ;
%<s_sg1%>yohui%<v%>%<iv%>%<pres%>:ni%>yo%{w%}      # ; ! Dir/RL
%<s_sg2%>yohui%<v%>%<iv%>%<pres%>:ti%>yo%{w%}      # ; ! Dir/RL
%<s_sg3%>yohui%<v%>%<iv%>%<pres%>:yohui            # ;
%<s_pl1%>yohui%<v%>%<iv%>%<pres%>:ti%>yohu%>ej     # ;
%<s_pl1%>yohui%<v%>%<iv%>%<pres%>:ti%>ohu%>ij      # ; ! Dir/LR
%<s_pl2%>yohui%<v%>%<iv%>%<pres%>:nan%>yohui       # ;
%<s_pl3%>yohui%<v%>%<iv%>%<pres%>:yakej            # ;
%<s_pl3%>yohui%<v%>%<iv%>%<pres%>:yohui%>j         # ;

%<s_pl1%>yohui%<v%>%<iv%>%<opt%>:ti%>ya%>kan       # ;
%<s_pl2%>yohui%<v%>%<iv%>%<opt%>:xi%>ya%>kan       # ;
%<s_pl3%>yohui%<v%>%<iv%>%<opt%>:ya%>kan           # ;

%<s_sg3%>yohui%<v%>%<iv%>%<pret%>:ya%>ki             # ;

%<s_sg1%>yohui%<v%>%<iv%>%<fut%>:ni%>ya%>s         # ;
%<s_sg2%>yohui%<v%>%<iv%>%<fut%>:ti%>ya%>s         # ;
%<s_sg3%>yohui%<v%>%<iv%>%<fut%>:ya%>s             # ;
%<s_pl3%>yohui%<v%>%<iv%>%<fut%>:ya%>s%>kej        # ;

%<s_sg1%>yohui%<v%>%<iv%>%<impf%>:ni%>yo%>ya       # ;
%<s_sg2%>yohui%<v%>%<iv%>%<impf%>:ti%>yo%>ya       # ;
%<s_sg3%>yohui%<v%>%<iv%>%<impf%>:ya%>ya           # ;
%<s_pl3%>yohui%<v%>%<iv%>%<impf%>:ya%>ya%>j        # ;

LEXICON Huitsa

%<s_sg1%>huitsa%<v%>%<iv%>%<pres%>:ni%>huitsa      # ;
%<s_sg2%>huitsa%<v%>%<iv%>%<pres%>:ti%>huitsa      # ;
%<s_sg3%>huitsa%<v%>%<iv%>%<pres%>:huitsa          # ;
%<s_pl1%>huitsa%<v%>%<iv%>%<pres%>:huits%>ej       # ;

!%<s_sg3%>huitsa%<v%>%<iv%>%<pret%>:huits           # ;

LEXICON Miscellanea
ok%<x%>:ok                                         FALSE ; ! ""
ix%<x%>:ix                                         FALSE ; 
chi%<x%>:chi                                       FALSE ; 
g%<x%>:g                                           FALSE ;
me%<x%>:me                                         FALSE ; 
kim%<x%>:kim                                       FALSE ; 
m%<x%>:m                                           FALSE ; 
LEXICON Adjetivos 
kuali:kual                                          ADJ-KUALI ; ! "bonito"
kuakuali:kua%{j%}kual                               ADJ-KUALI ; ! "bonito"
hueyi:hue                                            ADJ-KUALI ; ! "grande"
hueyi:hue%{j%}hue                                   ADJ-HUEI; ! "grande"
selontsin:selontsin                                 ADJ-TSIN ; ! "tiernitos"
tenkoyoktik:tenkoyoktik                             ADJ ; ! ""
pojpochiktik:po%{j%}pochiktik                       ADJ-REDUP ; ! "muy blanco"
malakachtik:malakachtik                             ADJ ; ! "circular"
tejtetsiltik:te%{j%}tetsiltik                       ADJ-REDUP ; ! "torcido"
istak:istak                                         ADJ ; ! "blanco"
nejnextik:ne%{j%}nextik                             ADJ-REDUP ; ! "gris"
naltoktik:naltoktik                                 ADJ ; ! "transparente"
pijpitsaktsin:pi%{j%}pitsaktsin                     ADJ-TSIN ; ! "delgadito"
chikahuak:chikahuak                                 ADJ ; ! "fuerte"
tsojtsopek:tso%{j%}tsopek                           ADJ-REDUP ; ! "dulce"
tojtotonik:to%{j%}totonik                           ADJ-REDUP ; ! "caliente"
xaxakachtik:xaxakachtik                             ADJ ; ! "reposo"
pijpitsahuak:pi%{j%}pitsahuak                       ADJ-REDUP ; ! "angosto, delgado"
huejhuejkapan:hue%{j%}huejkapan                     ADJ-REDUP ; ! "alto"
elihuis:elihuis                                     ADJ ; ! "salvaje"
kuetaxtik:kuetaxtik                                 ADJ ; ! "flexible"
espacial:espacial                                   ADJ-SPA-MEJOR ;
austral:austral                                     ADJ-SPA-MEJOR ;
nuclear:nuclear                                     ADJ-SPA-MEJOR ;
celular:celular                                     ADJ-SPA-MEJOR ;
mejor:mejor                                         ADJ-SPA-MEJOR ;
nacional:nacional                                   ADJ-SPA-MEJOR ;
principal:principal                                 ADJ-SPA-MEJOR ;
libre:libre                                         ADJ-SPA-LIBRE ;
indígena:indígena                                   ADJ-SPA-LIBRE ;
lácteo:lácte                                        ADJ-SPA-MALO ; ! ""
cancerígeno:cancerígen                              ADJ-SPA-MALO ;
puro:pur                                            ADJ-SPA-MALO ; ! ""
sano:san                                            ADJ-SPA-MALO ; ! ""
igualito:igualit                                    ADJ-SPA-MALO ; ! ""
mero:mer                                            ADJ-SPA-MALO ; ! ""
nanométrico:nanométric                              ADJ-SPA-MALO ; ! ""  
LEXICON Adverbios 
keni:keni                                           ADV-ITG ; ! "cómo"
kinin:kinin                                         ADV-ITG ; ! "cómo"
keni:keniuj                                         ADV-ITG ; ! "cómo"
keni:kenuij                                         ADV-ITG ; ! "cómo"
keniuki:keniuki                                     ADV-ITG ; ! "cómo es"
keniukitik:keniukitik                               ADV-ITG ; ! "cómo es"
keyej:keyéj                                         ADV-ITG ; ! "por qué"
kani:kan                                            ADV-ITG ; ! "dónde"
kampa:kampa                                         ADV-REL ; ! "donde"
kampa:kanpa                                         ADV-REL ; ! "donde"
aparte:aparte                                       ADV-SPA ;
apenas:apenas                                       ADV-SPA ;
aparte:aparte                                       ADV-SPA ;
ahorita:ahorita                                     ADV-SPA ; ! "
siquiera:siquiera                                   ADV-SPA ; ! "
después:después                                     ADV-SPA ; ! "
aún:aún                                             ADV-SPA ; ! ""
sólo:sólo                                           ADV-SPA ; ! "
